Washington statutes.
RCW 35.58.480

Borrowing money from component city or county.

A metropolitan municipal corporation shall have the power when authorized by a majority of all members of the metropolitan council to borrow money from any component city or county and such cities or counties are hereby authorized to make such loans or advances on such terms as may be mutually agreed upon by the legislative bodies of the metropolitan municipal corporation and any such component city or county to provide funds to carry out the purposes of the metropolitan municipal corporation.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.58.480. Prior: 1957 c 213 s 48.]